Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle B. Contests of Primary Elections.

§ 23-15-921.
Nominations to county or county district offices, etc.; petition, notice of contest, investigation, and determination.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-961, a person desiring to contest the election of another person returned as the nominee of the party to any county or county district office, or as the nominee of a legislative district composed of one (1) county or less, may, within twenty (20) days after the primary election, file a petition with the secretary, or any member of the county executive committee in the county in which the election was held, setting forth the grounds upon which the primary election is contested; and it shall be the duty of the executive committee to assemble by call of the chairman or three (3) members of said committee, notice of which contest shall be served five (5) days before said meeting, and after notifying all parties concerned proceed to investigate the grounds upon which the election is contested and, by majority vote of members present, declare the true results of such primary.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code § 3143 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6425; 1930, § 5896; Laws, 1908, ch. 136; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 280; Laws, 1988, ch. 577, § 3, eff from and after December 9, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).

§ 23-15-923.
Nominations with respect to state, congressional, and judicial districts, etc.; investigation, findings, and declaration of nominee.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 23-15-961, a person desiring to contest the election of another returned as the nominee in state, congressional and judicial districts, and in legislative districts composed of more than one (1) county or parts of more than one (1) county, upon complaint filed with the Chairman of the State Executive Committee, by petition, reciting the grounds upon which the election is contested. If necessary and with the advice of four (4) members of said committee, the chairman shall issue his fiat to the chairman of the appropriate county executive committee, and in like manner as in the county office, the county committee shall investigate the complaint and return their findings to the chairman of the state committee. The State Executive Committee by majority vote of members present shall declare the true results of such primary.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3144 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6426; 1930, § 5897; Laws, 1908, ch. 136; repealed by Laws, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 281; Laws, 1988, ch. 577, § 4, eff from and after December 9, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).

§ 23-15-925.
Power of committee to subpoena and to attach witnesses.

For the proper enforcement of the preceding sections the committee has the power to subpoena and, if necessary, attach witnesses needed in said investigation.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3145 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6427; 1930, § 5898; Laws, 1908, ch. 136; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 282, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-927.
Filing of protest and petition in circuit court in event of unreasonable delay by committee; requirement of certificate and cost bond; suspension of committee’s order.

When and after any contest has been filed with the county executive committee, or complaint with the State Executive Committee, and the executive committee having jurisdiction fails to promptly meet or, having met, fails or unreasonably delays to fully act upon the contest or complaint or fails to give with reasonable promptness the full relief required by the facts and the law, the contestant shall have the right forthwith to file in the circuit court of the county in which the irregularities are charged to have occurred, or, if more than one (1) county is involved, then in one (1) of the counties, a sworn copy of his protest or complaint, together with a sworn petition, setting forth with particularity how the executive committee has wrongfully failed to act or to fully and promptly investigate or has wrongfully denied the relief prayed by the contest, with a prayer for a judicial review thereof. A petition for judicial review must be filed within ten (10) days after any contest or complaint has been filed with an executive committee. The petition for a judicial review shall not be filed unless it bears the certificate of two (2) practicing attorneys stating that they have each fully made an independent investigation into the matters of fact and of law upon which the protest and petition are based, and that after the investigation they believe that the protest and petition should be sustained and that the relief prayed in the protest and petitions should be granted; the two (2) attorneys may not be practicing in the same law firm. The petitioner shall give a cost bond in the sum of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), with two (2) or more sufficient sureties conditioned to pay all costs in case his petition be dismissed, and an additional bond may be required, by the judge, if necessary, at any subsequent stage of the proceedings. The filing of the petition for judicial review in the manner set forth in this section shall automatically supersede and suspend the operation and effect of the order, ruling or judgment of the executive committee appealed from. In no event shall a prayer for relief be filed in any court other than the appropriate circuit court as authorized in this section.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-45 [Codes, 1942, § 3182; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1968, ch. 567, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 283; Laws, 2012, ch. 476, § 1, eff September 17, 2012 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-929.
Designation of circuit judge or retired judge on senior status to determine contest; notice; answer and cross-complaint.

Upon the filing of the petition and bond as provided for in Section 23-15-927, the circuit clerk shall immediately, by registered letter or by telegraph or telephone, or personally, notify the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, or, in his absence, or disability, some other judge of the Supreme Court, who shall forthwith designate and notify a circuit judge or a retired judge on senior status of a district other than that which embraces the county or any of the counties, involved in the contest or complaint, to proceed to the county in which the contest or complaint has been filed to hear and determine the contest or complaint, and it shall be the official duty of the trial judge to proceed to the discharge of the designated duty at the earliest possible date to be fixed by the judge and of which the contestant and contestee shall have reasonable notice, to be served in such reasonable manner as the judge may direct, in response to which notice the contestee shall promptly file his answer, and also his cross-complaint if he has one to prefer.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-47 [Codes, 1942, § 3183; Laws, 1935 ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 284; Laws, 2012, ch. 476, § 2, eff September 17, 2012 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-931.
Issuance of subpoenas and summonses by circuit clerk prior to hearing; assistance by, and findings of, election commissioners; entry of judgment by trial judge.

When the day for the hearing has been set, the circuit clerk shall issue subpoenas for witnesses as in other litigated cases, and he shall also issue a summons to each of the five (5) election commissioners of the county, unless they waive summons, requiring them to attend the hearing, throughout which the commissioners shall sit with the judge as advisors or assistants in the trial and determination of the facts, and as assistants in counts, calculations and inspections, and in seeing to it that ballots, papers, documents, books and the like are diligently secured against misplacement, alteration, concealment or loss both in the sessions and during recesses or adjournments. The judge is, however, the controlling judge both of the facts and the law, and has all the power in every respect of a circuit judge in termtime. The tribunal shall be attended by the sheriff, and clerk, each with sufficient deputies, and by a court reporter. The special tribunal so constituted shall fully hear the contest or complaint de novo, and the original contestant before the party executive committee shall have the burden of proof and the burden of going forward with the evidence in the hearing before the special tribunal. The special tribunal, after the contest or complaint has been fully heard anew, shall make a finding dictated to the reporter covering all controverted material issues of fact, together with any dissents of any commissioner, and thereupon, the trial judge shall enter the judgment which the county executive committee should have entered, of which the election commissioners shall take judicial notice, or if the matter be one within the jurisdiction of the State Executive Committee, the judgment shall be certified and promptly forwarded to the Secretary of the State Executive Committee, and, in the absence of an appeal, it shall be the duty of the State Executive Committee forthwith to reassemble and revise any decision theretofore made by it so as to conform to the judicial judgment; that when the contest is upon a complaint filed with the State Executive Committee and the petition to the court avers that the wrong or irregularity is one which occurred wholly within the proceedings of the state committee, the petition to the court shall be filed in the Circuit Court of Hinds County and, after notice served, shall be promptly heard by the circuit judge of that county, without the attendance of commissioners.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-49 [Codes, 1942, § 3184; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1968, ch. 567, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 285; Laws, 2012, ch. 476, § 3, eff September 17, 2012 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-933.
Appeal from judgment; restrictions upon review of findings of fact.

The contestant or contestee, or both, may file an appeal in the Supreme Court within the time and under such conditions and procedures as are established by the Supreme Court for other appeals. If the findings of fact have been concurred in by all the commissioners in attendance, provided as many as three (3) commissioners are and have been in attendance, the facts shall not be subject to appellate review. But if not so many as three (3) of the commissioners are or have been in attendance, or if one or more commissioners dissent, upon review, the Supreme Court may make such findings as the evidence requires.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-51 [Codes, 1942, § 3185; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1968, ch. 567, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 286, eff from and after January 1, 1987; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 108, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 23-15-935.
Attendance or absence of election commissioners at hearing.

The trial judge shall have the same power to compel the attendance of the election commissioners upon and throughout the hearings as is given to the judge of a circuit court to compel the attendance of jurors, and the commissioners must attend unless physically unable so to do. But if any one or more or all of the commissioners are absent so as to not be served with notice, or is or are physically unable to attend, the trial judge shall proceed without them or any of them, so that the hearing shall not be delayed on their account or on account of any one or more of them. When, under Section 23-15-937, the hearing is transferred in whole or in part to another county or counties, the election commissioners of the county or counties to which the hearing is transferred shall attend the hearings in their respective counties, subject to foregoing provisions in respect to absent or disabled commissioners.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-53 [Codes, 1942, § 3186; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 287, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-937.
Transfer of hearing; requirement of prompt adjudication; circumstances requiring special election.

If more than one (1) county is involved in a contest or complaint, the judge shall have the authority to transfer the hearing to a more convenient county within the district, if the contest or complaint involves a district office, or within the state if the contest or complaint involves a state office; or the judge may proceed to any county or counties in which the facts complained of are charged to have transpired, and there hear the evidence and make a finding of facts relating to that county and any convenient neighboring county or counties, but, in any event, if possible with due diligence to do so, the hearing must be completed and final judgment rendered in time to permit the printing and distribution of the official ballots at the election for which the contested nomination is made. When any judge lawfully designated to hear a contest or complaint shall not promptly and diligently proceed with the hearing and final determination of the contest or complaint, he shall be guilty of a high misdemeanor in office unless excused by actual illness, or by an equivalent excuse. When no final decision has been made by the time the official ballots are required to be printed, the name of the nominee declared by the party executive committee shall be printed on the official ballots as the party nominee, but the contest or complaint shall not thereby be dismissed but the cause shall nevertheless proceed to final judgment and if the judgment is in favor of the contestant, the election of the contestee shall thereby be vacated and the Governor, or the Lieutenant Governor, in case the Governor is a party to the contest, shall call a special election for the office or offices involved. If the contestee has already entered upon the term he shall vacate the office upon the qualification of the person elected at the special election, and may be removed by quo warranto if he fail so to do.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-55 [Codes, 1942, § 3187; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 288; Laws, 2012, ch. 476, § 4, eff September 17, 2012 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-939.
Payment of traveling expenses of judge or chancellor; compensation of election commissioners.

The reasonable traveling expenses of the judge or chancellor shall be paid by order of the board of supervisors of the county or counties in which a contest or complaint is heard, upon an itemized certificate thereof by the judge or chancellor. The election commissioners shall be compensated for their services rendered under this section as is provided in Section 23-15-227.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-57 [Codes, 1942, § 3188; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 289; Laws, 2012, ch. 476, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 155, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-941.
Willful violation of election statute constituting criminal offense; issuance of arrest warrant; delivery of papers to grand jury foreman.

If upon the hearing of a primary election contest or complaint, under Section 23-15-931, it shall distinctly appear to the trial judge that any person, including a candidate or election officer, has willfully and corruptly violated any primary election statute and such violation is by said statute made a criminal offense, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, it shall be the duty of the trial judge to issue immediately his warrant for the arrest of the guilty party, reciting in his order therefor, in brief, the grounds or causes for the arrest. Such warrant and a certified copy of the order shall be forthwith placed in the hands of the sheriff of the county wherein the offense occurred, and the sheriff shall at once, upon receipt of the warrant, arrest the party and commit him to prison, unless and until the party give bond in the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) with two (2) or more good and sufficient sureties conditioned for his appearance at the next term of the circuit court and from term to term until discharged by law. When the arrest has been made and the bond, if any, given, the sheriff shall deliver all the papers therein with his return thereon to the circuit clerk who shall file, and thereafter personally deliver, the same to the foreman of the next grand jury.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-59 [Codes, 1942, § 3189; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 23; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 290, eff from and after January 1, 1987.